Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.1914] DENTAL ASSISTING AND HYGIENE EDUCATION PROGRAM EXPANDED-CAPACITY GRANTS AND FORGIVABLE LOANS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Grant and loan program established. new text end new text begin The commissioner of health shall make grants and forgivable loans available to dental assisting higher education programs and dental hygiene higher education programs that are accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation for eligible projects to expand student enrollment capacity. The commissioner may consider programs that have applied for but have not yet received accreditation from the Commission on Dental Accreditation. Eligible projects include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) expanding or improving existing clinic physical infrastructure; new text end new text begin (2) creating and building new clinic physical infrastructure; new text end new text begin (3) improving classroom physical structure; new text end new text begin (4) creating student scholarships; new text end new text begin (5) improving faculty and staff salaries; new text end new text begin (6) obtaining needed equipment and educational resources; and new text end new text begin (7) addressing other needs identified by an applicant. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Program oversight. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall award grants and forgivable loans based on information provided in the grant application. The commissioner may request additional information from applicants when determining eligibility. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall give priority to programs that have the highest potential to increase student capacity. new text end new text begin (c) When making determinations, the commissioner shall not demonstrate any preference between dental hygiene and dental assisting programs. new text end new text begin (d) A higher education institution with dental hygiene and dental assisting programs that is both interested in applying for grants and forgivable loans may submit one joint application. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DENTAL ASSISTING AND DENTAL HYGIENE PROGRAM EXPANDED CAPACITY GRANTS.new text end new text begin $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the dental assisting and dental hygiene education program expanded capacity grants and forgivable loans in section 1. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end